test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xonasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - хонась: # Verb 'to ' - partial paradigm

     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu1: хонаиниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu2: хонаидиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu3: хонаихиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl1: хонаинаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl2: хонаидаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl3: хонаидˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg1: хонаивˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg2: хонаин
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg3: хонаиˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu1: хонаининзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu2: хонаидинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu3: хонаихинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl1: хонаинаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl2: хонаидаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl3: хонаидаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg1: хонаиваць
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg2: хонаинась
     хонась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg3: хонаиць
     хонась+V+Refl+ConNeg: хонаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Evas+Abs: хонавоӈгад
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+ConNeg: хонаӈгуˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: хонаӈгуниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: хонаӈгудиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: хонаӈгухуʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: хонаӈгунаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: хонаӈгудаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: хонаӈгудˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: хонаӈгувˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: хонаӈгун
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: хонаӈгуˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Fut+Subord+Abs: хонаӈгобˮ     
     хонась+V+Refl+GerFin: хонаванзь      
     хонась+V+Refl+Ger: [хона, хонась] 
     хонась+V+Refl+Hort+RcDu1: хонаханиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Hort+RcPl1: хонаханаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Hort+RcSg1: хонахавˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcDu2: хонэйдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcPl2: хонэйдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcSg2: хонадˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: хонэйниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: хонэйдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: хонэйхаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: хонэйнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: хонэйдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: хонэядˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: [хонэювˮ, хонэявˮ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: хонэян
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: хонэйˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu1: хонэйнинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu2: хонэйдинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu3: хонэйханзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl1: хонэйнаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl2: хонэйдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl3: хонэйдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg1: хонэйваць
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg2: хонэйнась
     хонась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg3: хонэяць
     хонась+V+Refl+InfImprf: хонава  
     хонась+V+Refl+InfPrf: хонаˮма  
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu1: хонанархыниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu2: хонанархыдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu3: хонанархыхаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl1: хонанархынаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl2: хонанархыдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl3: хонанархыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg1: хонанархывˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg2: хонанархын
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg3: хонанархыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu1: хонарабиниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu2: хонарабидиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu3: хонарабихаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl1: хонарабинаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl2: хонарабидаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl3: хонарабидˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg1: хонарабивˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg2: хонарабин
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg3: хонарабиˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu1: хонавандархыниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu2: хонавандархыдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu3: хонавандархыхаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl1: хонавандархынаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl2: хонавандархыдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl3: хонавандархыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg1: хонавандархывˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg2: хонавандархын
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg3: хонавандархыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu1: хонарахавэниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu2: хонарахавэдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu3: хонарахавэхэʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl1: хонарахавэнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl2: хонарахавэдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl3: хонарахавыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg1: хонарахавэвˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg2: хонарахавэн
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg3: хонарахавыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu1: хонасяниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu2: хонасядиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu3: хонасяхаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl1: хонасянаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl2: хонасядаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl3: хонасядˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg1: хонасявˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg2: хонасян
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: хонасьˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu1: хонавэниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu2: хонавэдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu3: хонавэхэʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl1: хонавэнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl2: хонавэдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl3: хонавыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg1: хонавэвˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg2: хонавэн
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg3: хонавыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu1: хонавэнинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu2: хонавэдинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu3: хонавэхэнзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl1: хонавэнаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl2: хонавэдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl3: хонавыдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg1: хонавэваць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg2: хонавэнась
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg3: хонавыць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu1: хонабцуниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu2: хонабцудиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu3: хонабцухуʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl1: хонабцунаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl2: хонабцудаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl3: хонабцудˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg1: хонабцувˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg2: хонабцун
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg3: хонабцуˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu1: хонабцакэниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu2: хонабцакэдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu3: хонабцакэхэʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl1: хонабцакэнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl2: хонабцакэдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl3: хонабцакыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg1: хонабцакэвˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg2: хонабцакэн
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg3: хонабцакыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu1: хонавэрхыниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu2: хонавэрхыдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu3: хонавэрхыхаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl1: хонавэрхынаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl2: хонавэрхыдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl3: хонавэрхыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg1: хонавэрхывˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg2: хонавэрхын
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg3: хонавэрхыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu1: хонавэкэниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu2: хонавэкэдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu3: хонавэкэхэʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl1: хонавэкэнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl2: хонавэкэдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl3: хонавэкыдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg1: хонавэкэвˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg2: хонавэкэн
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg3: хонавэкыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu1: хонанакэниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu2: хонанакэдиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu3: хонанакэхэʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl1: хонанакэнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl2: хонанакэдаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl3: хонанакыдˮ 
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg1: хонанакэвˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg2: хонанакэн
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg3: хонанакыˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu1: хонанакэнинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu2: хонанакэдинзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu3: хонанакэхэнзь
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl1: хонанакэнаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl2: хонанакэдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl3: хонанакыдаць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg1: хонанакэваць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg2: хонанакэнась
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg3: хонанакыць
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu1: хонавнаниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu2: хонавнадиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu3: хонавнахаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl1: хонавнанаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl2: хонавнадаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl3: хонавнадˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg1: хонавнавˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg2: хонавнан
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg3: хонавнаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu1: хонаванӈгабиниʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu2: хонаванӈгабидиʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu3: хонаванӈгабихаʼ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl1: хонаванӈгабинаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl2: хонаванӈгабидаˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl3: хонаванӈгабидˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg1: хонаванӈгабивˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg2: хонаванӈгабин
     хонась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg3: хонаванӈгабиˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Opt+RcDu3: хонэйхамдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Opt+RcPl3: хонэйдамдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Opt+RcSg3: хонэямдˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+PrcFut: хонаванда   
     хонась+V+Refl+PrcImprf: хонана
     хонась+V+Refl+PrcNeg: хонавдавэй
     хонась+V+Refl+PrcPrf: хонавы
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+Abs: хонабˮ
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu1: [хонабˮнаниʼ, хонабаˮниʼ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu2: [хонабˮнандиʼ, хонабаˮтиʼ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu3: [хонабˮнандиʼ, хонабаˮтиʼ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl1: [хонабˮнанаˮ, хонабаˮнаˮ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl2: [хонабˮнандаˮ, хонабатаˮ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl3: [хонабˮнандоʼ, хонабатоʼ]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg1: [хонабˮнан, хонабаˮн]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg2: [хонабˮнанд, хонабат]
     хонась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg3: [хонабˮнанда, хонабата, хонабатавʼ] 
